Hawaii statutes.
[§658F-10] Saving clause. This chapter
does not prevent the recognition under principles of comity or otherwise of a
foreign-country judgment not within the scope of this chapter. [L 2009, c 34,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next